District of Columbia statutes.
8-1404.01

Reimbursements.

(a)

The owner of any hazardous material motor carrier that releases a hazardous material shall reimburse the District for all expenditures made by the District to contain, remove, or respond to such a release.

(b)

The Mayor shall notify by certified mail the owner of any hazardous material motor carrier that releases a hazardous material of the costs incurred by the District to contain, remove, or respond to the release.

(c)

If the owner of the hazardous material motor carrier does not reimburse the District for all expenditures made to contain, remove, or respond to the release, within 10 days of the posting of notice by the Mayor, the Corporation Counsel may bring a civil action to seek reimbursement from the owner of the motor carrier.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 5(a)
as added Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-173, § 3(d), 39 DCR 5834

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3304.1.